Wisconsin, session 2025, SB569.
do enact as follows:SB569,11Section 1. 115.7915 (6) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:SB569,2,62115.7915 (6) (h) 1. Implement the child’s most recent individualized 3education program or services plan, as modified by agreement between the private 4school and the child’s parent, and related services agreed to by the private school 5and the child’s parent that are not included in the child’s individualized education 6program or services plan.SB569,2,1072. Within 5 days of receiving a request from the resident school board of a 8child with a disability attending the private school under this section, provide all 9records relating to the implementation of the child’s individualized education 10program or services plan by the private school, as required under subd. 1.SB569,211Section 2. Initial applicability.SB569,2,1212(1) This act first applies to the 2026-27 school year.SB569,2,1313